Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 360.015, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Fuel requirements. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must not establish, including through rulemaking, restrictions for a municipality on fuel distribution at an airport, including but not limited to fuel purchasing, fuel storage, and management of fuel distribution facilities. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this subdivision prevents the establishment of requirements for financial assistance specifically related to fuel facilities. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end